Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 82.14.055 and 2016 c 46 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (((4)))(5) of this section, a local sales and use tax change may take effect (a) no sooner than ((seventy-five))75 days after the department ((receives notice))is notified in writing of the change and (b) only on the first day of January, April, or July.(2) In the case of a local sales and use tax that is a credit against the state sales tax or use tax, a local sales and use tax change may take effect (a) no sooner than ((thirty))30 days after the department ((receives notice))is notified in writing of the change and (b) only on the first day of a month.(3)(a) A local sales and use tax rate increase imposed on services applies to the first billing period starting on or after the effective date of the increase.(b) A local sales and use tax rate decrease imposed on services applies to bills rendered on or after the effective date of the decrease.(c) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "services" means retail services such as installing and constructing and retail services such as telecommunications, but does not include services such as tattooing.(4) Authorized authorities contracting with the department under RCW 82.14.050(1) that make a local sales and use tax change must notify the department in writing of the change and provide a copy of the signed ordinance or resolution. If the local sales and use tax change results from an annexation, the written notification must also include a copy of the complete ordinance containing a legal description, a map showing specifically the boundaries of the annexed territory, and a list of all included parcel numbers in the annexed territory.(5) For the purposes of this section, "local sales and use tax change" means enactment or revision of local sales and use taxes under this chapter or any other statute, including changes resulting from referendum or annexation.Sec. 2. RCW 82.14.390 and 2017 c 164 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, the governing body of a public facilities district (a) created before July 31, 2002, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that commenced construction of at least one new regional center, or improvement or rehabilitation of an existing new regional center, before January 1, 2004; (b) created before July 1, 2006, under chapter 35.57 RCW in a county or counties in which there are no other public facilities districts on June 7, 2006, and in which the total population in the public facilities district is greater than ((ninety thousand))90,000 that commenced construction of a new regional center before February 1, 2007; (c) created under the authority of RCW 35.57.010(1)(d); or (d) created before September 1, 2007, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW, in a county or counties in which there are no other public facilities districts on July 22, 2007, and in which the total population in the public facilities district is greater than ((seventy thousand))70,000, that commenced construction of a new regional center before January 1, 2009, or before January 1, 2011, in the case of a new regional center in a county designated by the president as a disaster area in December 2007, may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the public facilities district. The rate of tax may not exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.(2)(a) The governing body of a public facilities district imposing a sales and use tax under the authority of this section may increase the rate of tax up to 0.037 percent if, within three fiscal years of July 1, 2008, the department determines that, as a result of RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to RCW 82.14.020, a public facilities district's sales and use tax collections for fiscal years after July 1, 2008, have been reduced by a net loss of at least 0.50 percent from the fiscal year before July 1, 2008. The fiscal year in which this section becomes effective is the first fiscal year after July 1, 2008.(b) The department must determine sales and use tax collection net losses under this section ((as provided in RCW 82.14.500 (2) and (3))). The department must provide written notice of its determinations to public facilities districts. Determinations by the department of a public facilities district's sales and use tax collection net losses as a result of RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to RCW 82.14.020 are final and not appealable.(c) A public facilities district may increase its rate of tax after it has received written notice from the department as provided in (b) of this subsection. The increase in the rate of tax must be made in 0.001 percent increments and must be the least amount necessary to mitigate the net loss in sales and use tax collections as a result of RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to RCW 82.14.020. The increase in the rate of tax is subject to RCW 82.14.055.(3) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section must be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue must perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public facilities district. ((During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, distributions by the state to a public facilities district based on the additional rate authorized in subsection (2) of this section must be reduced by 3.4 percent.))(4)(a) No tax may be collected under this section before August 1, 2000. The tax imposed in this section expires when bonds issued to finance or refinance the construction, improvement, rehabilitation, or expansion of the regional center and related parking facilities are retired, but not more than ((forty))40 years after the tax is first collected.(b) A public facilities district that imposes the tax under this section must notify the department in writing of the actual date the bonds will be retired.(c) Notification of a bond's actual retirement date must be made at least 75 days before retirement.(5) Moneys collected under this section may only be used for the purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount from other public or private sources equal to ((thirty-three))33 percent of the amount collected under this section; however, amounts generated from nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 35.57 RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 36.100 RCW do not constitute a public or private source. For the purpose of this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited to cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development or improvement of the regional center, land that is donated and used for the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind contributions from public or private foundations, or amounts attributed to private sector partners as part of a public and private partnership agreement negotiated by the public facilities district.(6) The combined total tax levied under this section may not be greater than 0.037 percent. If both a public facilities district created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this section, the tax imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter 35.57 RCW must be credited against the tax imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.(7) A public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW is not eligible to impose the tax under this section if the legislative authority of the county where the public facilities district is located has imposed a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.Sec. 3. RCW 82.14.485 and 2017 c 164 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In a county with a population under ((three hundred thousand))300,000, the governing body of a public facilities district, which is created before August 1, 2001, under chapter 35.57 RCW or before January 1, 2000, under chapter 36.100 RCW, in which the total population in the public facilities district is greater than ((ninety thousand))90,000 and less than ((one hundred thousand))100,000 that commences improvement or rehabilitation of an existing regional center, to be used for community events, and artistic, musical, theatrical, or other cultural exhibitions, presentations, or performances and having ((two thousand))2,000 or fewer permanent seats, before January 1, 2009, may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the public facilities district. The rate of tax for a public facilities district created prior to August 1, 2001, under chapter 35.57 RCW, may not exceed 0.025 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax. The rate of tax, for a public facilities district created prior to January 1, 2000, under chapter 36.100 RCW, may not exceed 0.020 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or the value of the article used in the case of a use tax.(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section must be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department must perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public facilities district.(3)(a) The tax imposed in this section expires when bonds issued to finance or refinance the construction, improvement, rehabilitation, or expansion of the regional center and related parking facilities are retired, but not more than ((forty))40 years after the tax is first collected.(b) A public facilities district that imposes the tax under this section must notify the department in writing, at least 75 days before retiring the bonds described in (a) of this subsection, of the actual date the bond will be retired.(4) Moneys collected under this section may only be used for the purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount from other public or private sources equal to ((thirty-three))33 percent of the amount collected under this section, provided that amounts generated from nonvoter-approved taxes authorized under chapter 35.57 RCW may not constitute a public or private source. For the purpose of this section, public or private sources include, but are not limited to cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development or improvement of the regional center, land that is donated and used for the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind contributions from public or private foundations, or amounts attributed to private sector partners as part of a public and private partnership agreement negotiated by the public facilities district.--- END ---